Illinois, session 104th, SB1471.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Sections 356z.3a and 370g as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/356z.3a)7    Sec. 356z.3a. Billing; emergency services; 8nonparticipating providers.9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Ancillary services" means:11        (1) items and services related to emergency medicine, 12    anesthesiology, pathology, radiology, and neonatology that 13    are provided by any health care provider;14        (2) items and services provided by assistant surgeons, 15    hospitalists, and intensivists;16        (3) diagnostic services, including radiology and 17    laboratory services, except for advanced diagnostic 18    laboratory tests identified on the most current list 19    published by the United States Secretary of Health and 20    Human Services under 42 U.S.C. 300gg-132(b)(3);21        (4) items and services provided by other specialty 22    practitioners as the United States Secretary of Health and 23    Human Services specifies through rulemaking under 42   SB1471- 2 -LRB104 09860 BAB 19928 b1    U.S.C. 300gg-132(b)(3);2        (5) items and services provided by a nonparticipating 3    provider if there is no participating provider who can 4    furnish the item or service at the facility; and5        (6) items and services provided by a nonparticipating 6    provider if there is no participating provider who will 7    furnish the item or service because a participating 8    provider has asserted the participating provider's rights 9    under the Health Care Right of Conscience Act. 10    "Cost sharing" means the amount an insured, beneficiary, 11or enrollee is responsible for paying for a covered item or 12service under the terms of the policy or certificate. "Cost 13sharing" includes copayments, coinsurance, and amounts paid 14toward deductibles, but does not include amounts paid towards 15premiums, balance billing by out-of-network providers, or the 16cost of items or services that are not covered under the policy 17or certificate.18    "Emergency department of a hospital" means any hospital 19department that provides emergency services, including a 20hospital outpatient department.21    "Emergency medical condition" has the meaning ascribed to 22that term in Section 10 of the Managed Care Reform and Patient 23Rights Act.24    "Emergency medical screening examination" has the meaning 25ascribed to that term in Section 10 of the Managed Care Reform 26and Patient Rights Act.  SB1471- 3 -LRB104 09860 BAB 19928 b1    "Emergency services" means, with respect to an emergency 2medical condition:3        (1) in general, any health care service provided to a 4    person to evaluate or treat a condition that requires 5    immediate unscheduled medical care, an emergency medical 6    screening examination, including ancillary services 7    routinely available to the emergency department to 8    evaluate such emergency medical condition, and such 9    further medical examination and treatment as would be 10    required to stabilize the patient regardless of the 11    department of the hospital, ground ambulance, or other 12    facility in which such further examination or treatment is 13    furnished, including any covered service for 14    transportation of a patient by a health care provider to a 15    participating or nonparticipating emergency facility for 16    an emergency medical condition; or17        (2) additional items and services for which benefits 18    are provided or covered under the coverage and that are 19    furnished by a nonparticipating provider or 20    nonparticipating emergency facility regardless of the 21    department of the hospital or other facility in which such 22    items are furnished after the insured, beneficiary, or 23    enrollee is stabilized and as part of outpatient 24    observation or an inpatient or outpatient stay with 25    respect to the visit in which the services described in 26    paragraph (1) are furnished. Services after stabilization   SB1471- 4 -LRB104 09860 BAB 19928 b1    cease to be emergency services only when all the 2    conditions of 42 U.S.C. 300gg-111(a)(3)(C)(ii)(II) and 3    regulations thereunder are met.4    "Freestanding Emergency Center" means a facility licensed 5under Section 32.5 of the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) 6Systems Act.7    "Health care facility" means, in the context of 8non-emergency services, any of the following:9        (1) a hospital as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1395x(e);10        (2) a hospital outpatient department;11        (3) a critical access hospital certified under 42 12    U.S.C. 1395i-4(e);13        (4) an ambulatory surgical treatment center as defined 14    in the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act; or15        (5) any recipient of a license under the Hospital 16    Licensing Act that is not otherwise described in this 17    definition.18    "Health care provider" means a provider as defined in 19subsection (d) of Section 370g. "Health care provider" does 20not include a provider of air ambulance or ground ambulance 21services.22    "Health care services" has the meaning ascribed to that 23term in subsection (a) of Section 370g.24    "Health insurance issuer" has the meaning ascribed to that 25term in Section 5 of the Illinois Health Insurance Portability 26and Accountability Act.  SB1471- 5 -LRB104 09860 BAB 19928 b1    "Nonparticipating emergency facility" means, with respect 2to the furnishing of an item or service under a policy of group 3or individual health insurance coverage, any of the following 4facilities that does not have a contractual relationship 5directly or indirectly with a health insurance issuer in 6relation to the coverage:7        (1) an emergency department of a hospital;8        (2) a Freestanding Emergency Center;9        (3) an ambulatory surgical treatment center as defined 10    in the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act; or11        (4) with respect to emergency services described in 12    paragraph (2) of the definition of "emergency services", a 13    hospital.14    "Nonparticipating provider" means, with respect to the 15furnishing of an item or service under a policy of group or 16individual health insurance coverage, any health care provider 17who does not have a contractual relationship directly or 18indirectly with a health insurance issuer in relation to the 19coverage.20    "Participating emergency facility" means any of the 21following facilities that has a contractual relationship 22directly or indirectly with a health insurance issuer offering 23group or individual health insurance coverage setting forth 24the terms and conditions on which a relevant health care 25service is provided to an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee 26under the coverage:  SB1471- 6 -LRB104 09860 BAB 19928 b1        (1) an emergency department of a hospital;2        (2) a Freestanding Emergency Center;3        (3) an ambulatory surgical treatment center as defined 4    in the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act; or5        (4) with respect to emergency services described in 6    paragraph (2) of the definition of "emergency services", a 7    hospital.8    For purposes of this definition, a single case agreement 9between an emergency facility and an issuer that is used to 10address unique situations in which an insured, beneficiary, or 11enrollee requires services that typically occur out-of-network 12constitutes a contractual relationship and is limited to the 13parties to the agreement.14    "Participating health care facility" means any health care 15facility that has a contractual relationship directly or 16indirectly with a health insurance issuer offering group or 17individual health insurance coverage setting forth the terms 18and conditions on which a relevant health care service is 19provided to an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee under the 20coverage. A single case agreement between an emergency 21facility and an issuer that is used to address unique 22situations in which an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee 23requires services that typically occur out-of-network 24constitutes a contractual relationship for purposes of this 25definition and is limited to the parties to the agreement.26    "Participating provider" means any health care provider   SB1471- 7 -LRB104 09860 BAB 19928 b1that has a contractual relationship directly or indirectly 2with a health insurance issuer offering group or individual 3health insurance coverage setting forth the terms and 4conditions on which a relevant health care service is provided 5to an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee under the coverage.6    "Qualifying payment amount" has the meaning given to that 7term in 42 U.S.C. 300gg-111(a)(3)(E) and the regulations 8promulgated thereunder.9    "Recognized amount" means the lesser of the amount 10initially billed by the provider or the qualifying payment 11amount.12    "Stabilize" means "stabilization" as defined in Section 10 13of the Managed Care Reform and Patient Rights Act.14    "Treating provider" means a health care provider who has 15evaluated the individual.16    "Visit" means, with respect to health care services 17furnished to an individual at a health care facility, health 18care services furnished by a provider at the facility, as well 19as equipment, devices, telehealth services, imaging services, 20laboratory services, and preoperative and postoperative 21services regardless of whether the provider furnishing such 22services is at the facility. 23    (b) Emergency services. When a beneficiary, insured, or 24enrollee receives emergency services from a nonparticipating 25provider or a nonparticipating emergency facility, the health 26insurance issuer shall ensure that the beneficiary, insured,   SB1471- 8 -LRB104 09860 BAB 19928 b1or enrollee shall incur no greater out-of-pocket costs than 2the beneficiary, insured, or enrollee would have incurred with 3a participating provider or a participating emergency 4facility. Any cost-sharing requirements shall be applied as 5though the emergency services had been received from a 6participating provider or a participating facility. Cost 7sharing shall be calculated based on the recognized amount for 8the emergency services. If the cost sharing for the same item 9or service furnished by a participating provider would have 10been a flat-dollar copayment, that amount shall be the 11cost-sharing amount unless the provider has billed a lesser 12total amount. In no event shall the beneficiary, insured, 13enrollee, or any group policyholder or plan sponsor be liable 14to or billed by the health insurance issuer, the 15nonparticipating provider, or the nonparticipating emergency 16facility for any amount beyond the cost sharing calculated in 17accordance with this subsection with respect to the emergency 18services delivered. Administrative requirements or limitations 19shall be no greater than those applicable to emergency 20services received from a participating provider or a 21participating emergency facility. 22    (b-5) Non-emergency services at participating health care 23facilities. 24        (1) When a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee utilizes 25    a participating health care facility and, due to any 26    reason, covered ancillary services are provided by a   SB1471- 9 -LRB104 09860 BAB 19928 b1    nonparticipating provider during or resulting from the 2    visit, the health insurance issuer shall ensure that the 3    beneficiary, insured, or enrollee shall incur no greater 4    out-of-pocket costs than the beneficiary, insured, or 5    enrollee would have incurred with a participating provider 6    for the ancillary services. Any cost-sharing requirements 7    shall be applied as though the ancillary services had been 8    received from a participating provider. Cost sharing shall 9    be calculated based on the recognized amount for the 10    ancillary services. If the cost sharing for the same item 11    or service furnished by a participating provider would 12    have been a flat-dollar copayment, that amount shall be 13    the cost-sharing amount unless the provider has billed a 14    lesser total amount. In no event shall the beneficiary, 15    insured, enrollee, or any group policyholder or plan 16    sponsor be liable to or billed by the health insurance 17    issuer, the nonparticipating provider, or the 18    participating health care facility for any amount beyond 19    the cost sharing calculated in accordance with this 20    subsection with respect to the ancillary services 21    delivered. In addition to ancillary services, the 22    requirements of this paragraph shall also apply with 23    respect to covered items or services furnished as a result 24    of unforeseen, urgent medical needs that arise at the time 25    an item or service is furnished, regardless of whether the 26    nonparticipating provider satisfied the notice and consent   SB1471- 10 -LRB104 09860 BAB 19928 b1    criteria under paragraph (2) of this subsection. 2        (2) When a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee utilizes 3    a participating health care facility and receives 4    non-emergency covered health care services other than 5    those described in paragraph (1) of this subsection from a 6    nonparticipating provider during or resulting from the 7    visit, the health insurance issuer shall ensure that the 8    beneficiary, insured, or enrollee incurs no greater 9    out-of-pocket costs than the beneficiary, insured, or 10    enrollee would have incurred with a participating provider 11    unless the nonparticipating provider or the participating 12    health care facility on behalf of the nonparticipating 13    provider satisfies the notice and consent criteria 14    provided in 42 U.S.C. 300gg-132 and regulations 15    promulgated thereunder. If the notice and consent criteria 16    are not satisfied, then:17            (A) any cost-sharing requirements shall be applied 18        as though the health care services had been received 19        from a participating provider;20            (B) cost sharing shall be calculated based on the 21        recognized amount for the health care services; and22            (C) in no event shall the beneficiary, insured, 23        enrollee, or any group policyholder or plan sponsor be 24        liable to or billed by the health insurance issuer, 25        the nonparticipating provider, or the participating 26        health care facility for any amount beyond the cost   SB1471- 11 -LRB104 09860 BAB 19928 b1        sharing calculated in accordance with this subsection 2        with respect to the health care services delivered. 3    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 4except when the notice and consent criteria are satisfied for 5the situation in paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5), any 6benefits a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee receives for 7services under the situations in subsection (b) or (b-5) are 8assigned to the nonparticipating providers or the facility 9acting on their behalf. Upon receipt of the provider's bill or 10facility's bill, the health insurance issuer shall provide the 11nonparticipating provider or the facility with a written 12explanation of benefits that specifies the proposed 13reimbursement and the applicable deductible, copayment, or 14coinsurance amounts owed by the insured, beneficiary, or 15enrollee. The health insurance issuer shall pay any 16reimbursement subject to this Section directly to the 17nonparticipating provider or the facility.18    (d) For bills assigned under subsection (c), the 19nonparticipating provider or the facility may bill the health 20insurance issuer for the services rendered, and the health 21insurance issuer may pay the billed amount or attempt to 22negotiate reimbursement with the nonparticipating provider or 23the facility. Within 30 calendar days after the provider or 24facility transmits the bill to the health insurance issuer, 25the issuer shall send an initial payment or notice of denial of 26payment with the written explanation of benefits to the   SB1471- 12 -LRB104 09860 BAB 19928 b1provider or facility. If attempts to negotiate reimbursement 2for services provided by a nonparticipating provider do not 3result in a resolution of the payment dispute within 30 days 4after receipt of written explanation of benefits by the health 5insurance issuer, then the health insurance issuer or 6nonparticipating provider or the facility may initiate binding 7arbitration to determine payment for services provided on a 8per-bill or batched-bill basis, in accordance with Section 9300gg-111 of the Public Health Service Act and the regulations 10promulgated thereunder. The party requesting arbitration shall 11notify the other party arbitration has been initiated and 12state its final offer before arbitration. In response to this 13notice, the nonrequesting party shall inform the requesting 14party of its final offer before the arbitration occurs. 15Arbitration shall be initiated by filing a request with the 16Department of Insurance.17    (e) The Department of Insurance shall publish a list of 18approved arbitrators or entities that shall provide binding 19arbitration. These arbitrators shall be American Arbitration 20Association or American Health Lawyers Association trained 21arbitrators. Both parties must agree on an arbitrator from the 22Department of Insurance's or its approved entity's list of 23arbitrators. If no agreement can be reached, then a list of 5 24arbitrators shall be provided by the Department of Insurance 25or the approved entity. From the list of 5 arbitrators, the 26health insurance issuer can veto 2 arbitrators and the   SB1471- 13 -LRB104 09860 BAB 19928 b1provider or facility can veto 2 arbitrators. The remaining 2arbitrator shall be the chosen arbitrator. This arbitration 3shall consist of a review of the written submissions by both 4parties. The arbitrator shall not establish a rebuttable 5presumption that the qualifying payment amount should be the 6total amount owed to the provider or facility by the 7combination of the issuer and the insured, beneficiary, or 8enrollee. Binding arbitration shall provide for a written 9decision within 45 days after the request is filed with the 10Department of Insurance. Both parties shall be bound by the 11arbitrator's decision. The arbitrator's expenses and fees, 12together with other expenses, not including attorney's fees, 13incurred in the conduct of the arbitration, shall be paid as 14provided in the decision.15    (f) (Blank).16    (g) Section 368a of this Act shall not apply during the 17pendency of a decision under subsection (d). Upon the issuance 18of the arbitrator's decision, Section 368a applies with 19respect to the amount, if any, by which the arbitrator's 20determination exceeds the issuer's initial payment under 21subsection (c), or the entire amount of the arbitrator's 22determination if initial payment was denied. Any interest 23required to be paid to a provider under Section 368a shall not 24accrue until after 30 days of an arbitrator's decision as 25provided in subsection (d), but in no circumstances longer 26than 150 days from the date the nonparticipating   SB1471- 14 -LRB104 09860 BAB 19928 b1facility-based provider billed for services rendered.2    (h) Nothing in this Section shall be interpreted to change 3the prudent layperson provisions with respect to emergency 4services under the Managed Care Reform and Patient Rights Act. 5    (i) Nothing in this Section shall preclude a health care 6provider from billing a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee for 7reasonable administrative fees, such as service fees for 8checks returned for nonsufficient funds and missed 9appointments.10    (j) Nothing in this Section shall preclude a beneficiary, 11insured, or enrollee from assigning benefits to a 12nonparticipating provider when the notice and consent criteria 13are satisfied under paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5) or in 14any other situation not described in subsection (b) or (b-5).15    (k) Except when the notice and consent criteria are 16satisfied under paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5), if an 17individual receives health care services under the situations 18described in subsection (b) or (b-5), no referral requirement 19or any other provision contained in the policy or certificate 20of coverage shall deny coverage, reduce benefits, or otherwise 21defeat the requirements of this Section for services that 22would have been covered with a participating provider. 23However, this subsection shall not be construed to preclude a 24provider contract with a health insurance issuer, or with an 25administrator or similar entity acting on the issuer's behalf, 26from imposing requirements on the participating provider,   SB1471- 15 -LRB104 09860 BAB 19928 b1participating emergency facility, or participating health care 2facility relating to the referral of covered individuals to 3nonparticipating providers.4    (l) Except if the notice and consent criteria are 5satisfied under paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5), 6cost-sharing amounts calculated in conformity with this 7Section shall count toward any deductible or out-of-pocket 8maximum applicable to in-network coverage.9    (m) The Department has the authority to enforce the 10requirements of this Section in the situations described in 11subsections (b) and (b-5), and in any other situation for 12which 42 U.S.C. Chapter 6A, Subchapter XXV, Parts D or E and 13regulations promulgated thereunder would prohibit an 14individual from being billed or liable for emergency services 15furnished by a nonparticipating provider or nonparticipating 16emergency facility or for non-emergency health care services 17furnished by a nonparticipating provider at a participating 18health care facility.19    (n) This Section does not apply with respect to air 20ambulance or ground ambulance services. This Section does not 21apply to any policy of excepted benefits or to short-term, 22limited-duration health insurance coverage. 23    (o) Nothing in this Section shall require an ambulance 24provider to bill a beneficiary, insured, enrollee, or health 25insurance issuer when prohibited by any other law, rule, 26ordinance, contract, or agreement. If an ambulance provider   SB1471- 16 -LRB104 09860 BAB 19928 b1other than an air ambulance provider is a nonparticipating 2provider when it furnishes emergency services under a contract 3with a unit of local government of this State, and if the unit 4of local government is permitted or required to bill a 5beneficiary, insured, enrollee, or health insurance issuer for 6the services furnished by the ambulance provider, this Section 7applies to the unit of local government as though it were the 8ambulance provider. This Section also applies when a unit of 9local government directly operates the ambulance provider that 10furnished emergency services to a beneficiary, insured, or 11enrollee.12    (p) A home rule unit may not regulate ambulance providers 13in a manner inconsistent with this Section. This Section is a 14limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of 15the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home 16rule units of powers and functions exercised by the State.17(Source: P.A. 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 18103-440, eff. 1-1-24.) 19    (215 ILCS 5/370g)  (from Ch. 73, par. 982g)20    Sec. 370g. Definitions. As used in this Article, the 21following definitions apply:22    (a) "Health care services" means health care services or 23products rendered or sold by a provider within the scope of the 24provider's license or legal authorization. The term includes, 25but is not limited to, hospital, medical, surgical, dental,   SB1471- 17 -LRB104 09860 BAB 19928 b1vision, ground ambulance, and pharmaceutical services or 2products.3    (b) "Insurer" means an insurance company or a health 4service corporation authorized in this State to issue policies 5or subscriber contracts which reimburse for expenses of health 6care services.7    (c) "Insured" means an individual entitled to 8reimbursement for expenses of health care services under a 9policy or subscriber contract issued or administered by an 10insurer.11    (d) "Provider" means an individual or entity duly licensed 12or legally authorized to provide health care services.13    (e) "Noninstitutional provider" means any person licensed 14under the Medical Practice Act of 1987, as now or hereafter 15amended.16    (f) "Beneficiary" means an individual entitled to 17reimbursement for expenses of or the discount of provider fees 18for health care services under a program where the beneficiary 19has an incentive to utilize the services of a provider which 20has entered into an agreement or arrangement with an 21administrator.22    (g) "Administrator" means any person, partnership or 23corporation, other than an insurer or health maintenance 24organization holding a certificate of authority under the 25"Health Maintenance Organization Act", as now or hereafter 26amended, that arranges, contracts with, or administers   SB1471- 18 -LRB104 09860 BAB 19928 b1contracts with a provider whereby beneficiaries are provided 2an incentive to use the services of such provider.3    (h) "Emergency medical condition" has the meaning given to 4that term in Section 10 of the Managed Care Reform and Patient 5Rights Act. 6(Source: P.A. 102-409, eff. 1-1-22.) 7    Section 10. The Health Maintenance Organization Act is 8amended by changing Section 4-15 as follows: 9    (215 ILCS 125/4-15)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1409.8)10    Sec. 4-15. (a) No contract or evidence of coverage for 11basic health care services delivered, issued for delivery, 12renewed or amended by a Health Maintenance Organization shall 13exclude coverage for emergency transportation by ambulance. 14For the purposes of this Section, the term "emergency" means a 15need for immediate medical attention resulting from a life 16threatening condition or situation or a need for immediate 17medical attention as otherwise reasonably determined by a 18physician, public safety official or other emergency medical 19personnel.20    (b) (Blank). Upon reasonable demand by a provider of 21emergency transportation by ambulance, a Health Maintenance 22Organization shall promptly pay to the provider, subject to 23coverage limitations stated in the contract or evidence of 24coverage, the charges for emergency transportation by   SB1471- 19 -LRB104 09860 BAB 19928 b1ambulance provided to an enrollee in a health care plan 2arranged for by the Health Maintenance Organization. By 3accepting any such payment from the Health Maintenance 4Organization, the provider of emergency transportation by 5ambulance agrees not to seek any payment from the enrollee for 6services provided to the enrollee.7(Source: P.A. 86-833; 86-1028.)